Monetary Policy and the Economic Outlook

Last year was a difficult one for the economy of the
United States. The slowdown in the growth of
economic activity that had become apparent in late
2000 intensified in the first half of the year. Businesses
slashed investment spending--making especially deep
cuts in outlays for high-technology equipment--in
response to weakening final demand, an oversupply of
some types of capital, and declining profits. As actual
and prospective sales deteriorated, many firms in the
factory sector struggled with uncomfortably high levels
of inventories, and the accompanying declines in
manufacturing output steepened. At the same time,
foreign economies also slowed, further reducing the
demand for U.S. production. The aggressive actions by
the Federal Reserve to ease the stance of monetary
policy in the first half of the year provided support to
consumer spending and the housing sector.
Nevertheless, the weakening in activity became more
widespread through the summer, job losses mounted
further, and the unemployment rate moved higher. With
few indications that economic conditions were about to
improve, with underlying inflation moderate and edging
lower, and with inflation expectations well contained,
the Federal Reserve continued its efforts to counter the
ongoing weakness by cutting the federal funds rate,
bringing the cumulative reduction in that rate to 3
percentage points by August.

The devastating events of September 11 further set
back an already fragile economy. Heightened
uncertainty and badly shaken confidence caused a
widespread pullback from economic activity and from
risk-taking in financial markets, where equity prices fell
sharply for several weeks and credit risk spreads
widened appreciably. The most pressing concern of the
Federal Reserve in the first few days following the
attacks was to help shore up the infrastructure of
financial markets and to provide massive quantities of
liquidity to limit potential disruptions to the functioning
of those markets. The economic fallout of the events of
September 11 led the Federal Open Market
Committee (FOMC) to cut the target federal funds rate
after a conference call early the following week and
again at each meeting through the end of the year (see
box "Monetary Policy after the Terrorist Attacks").

Displaying the same swift response to economic
developments that appears to have characterized much
business behavior in the current cyclical episode, firms
moved quickly to reduce payrolls and cut production
after mid-September. Although these adjustments
occurred across a broad swath of the economy,
manufacturing and industries related to travel,
hospitality, and entertainment bore the brunt of the
downturn. Measures of consumer confidence fell
sharply in the first few weeks after the attacks, but the
deterioration was not especially large by cyclical
standards, and improvement in some of these indexes
was evident in October. Similarly, equity prices started
to rebound in late September, and risk spreads began
to narrow somewhat by early November, when it
became apparent that the economic effects of the
attacks were proving less severe than many had feared.

Consumer spending remained surprisingly solid over the
final three months of the year in the face of enormous
economic uncertainty, widespread job losses, and
further deterioration of household balance sheets from
the sharp drop in equity prices immediately following
September 11. Several factors were at work in support
of household spending during this period. Low and
declining interest rates provided a lift to outlays for
durable goods and to activity in housing markets.
Nowhere was the boost from low interest rates more
apparent than in the sales of new motor vehicles, which
soared in response to the financing incentives offered
by manufacturers. Low mortgage interest rates not only
sustained high levels of new home construction but also
allowed households to refinance mortgages and extract
equity from homes to pay down other debts or to
increase spending. Fiscal policy provided additional
support to consumer spending. The cuts in taxes
enacted last year, including the rebates paid out over
the summer, cushioned the loss of income from the
deterioration in labor markets. And the purchasing
power of household income was further enhanced by
the sharp drop in energy prices during the autumn. With
businesses having positioned themselves to absorb a
falloff of demand, the surprising strength in household
spending late in the year resulted in a dramatic
liquidation of inventories. In the end, real gross
domestic product posted a much better performance
than had been anticipated in the immediate aftermath of
the attacks.

More recently, there have been encouraging signs that
economic activity is beginning to firm. Job losses
diminished considerably in December and January, and
initial claims for unemployment insurance and the level
of insured unemployment have reversed their earlier
sharp increases. Although motor vehicle purchases
have declined appreciably from their blistering
fourth-quarter pace, early readings suggest that
consumer spending overall has remained very strong
early this year. In the business sector, new orders for
capital equipment have provided some tentative
indications that the deep retrenchment in investment
spending could be abating. Meanwhile, purchasing
managers in the manufacturing sector report that orders
have strengthened and that they view the level of their
customers' inventories as being in better balance.
Indeed, the increasingly rapid pace of inventory runoff
over the course of the last year has left the level of
production well below that of sales, suggesting scope
for a recovery in output given the current sales pace.
Against this backdrop, the FOMC left its target for the
federal funds rate unchanged in January. However,
reflecting a concern that growth could be weaker than
the economy's potential for a time, the FOMC retained
its assessment that the risks were tilted unacceptably
toward economic weakness.

The extent and persistence of any recovery in
production will, of course, depend critically on the
trajectory of final demand in the period ahead. Several
factors are providing impetus to such a recovery in the
coming year. With the real federal funds rate hovering
around zero, monetary policy should be positioned to
support growth in spending. Money and credit
expanded fairly rapidly through the end of the year, and
many households and businesses have strengthened
their finances by locking in relatively low-cost long-term
credit. The second installment of personal income tax
cuts and scheduled increases in government spending
on homeland security and national defense also will
provide some stimulus to activity this year. Perhaps the
most significant potential support to the economy could
come from further gains in private-sector productivity.
Despite the pronounced slowdown in real GDP growth
last year, output per hour in the nonfarm business
sector increased impressively. Continued robust gains
in productivity, stemming from likely advances in
technology, should provide a considerable boost to
household and business incomes and spending and
contribute to a sustained, noninflationary recovery.

Still, the economy faces considerable risk of subpar
economic performance in the period ahead. Because
outlays for durable goods and for new homes have
been relatively well maintained in this cycle, the scope
for strong upward impetus from household spending
seems more limited than has often been the case in past
recoveries. Moreover, the net decline in household net
worth relative to income over the past two years is
likely to continue to restrain the growth of spending in
coming quarters. To be sure, the contraction in business
capital spending appears to be waning. But spending on
some types of equipment, most notably communications
equipment, continues to decline, and there are few signs
yet of a broad-based upturn in capital outlays. Activity
abroad remains subdued, and a rebound of foreign
output is likely to follow, not lead, a rebound in the
United States. Furthermore, lenders and equity
investors remain quite cautious. Banks have continued
to tighten terms and standards on loans, and risk
spreads have increased a little this year. Stock prices
have retreated from recent highs as earnings continue to
fall amid concerns about the transparency of corporate
financial reports and uncertainty about the pace at
which profitability will improve.


Monetary Policy, Financial Markets, and the
Economy over 2001 and Early 2002

As economic weakness spread and intensified over the
first half of 2001, the FOMC aggressively lowered its
target for the federal funds rate. Because firms reacted
unusually swiftly to indicators that inventories were
uncomfortably high and capital was becoming
underutilized, the drop in production and business
capital spending was especially steep. Moreover, sharp
downward revisions in corporate profit expectations
caused equity prices to plunge, which, along with a
decline in consumer confidence, pointed to vulnerability
in household spending. Meanwhile, a significant
deceleration in energy prices, after a surge early in the
year, began to hold down overall inflation; the
restraining effect of energy prices, combined with the
moderation of resource utilization, also promised to
reduce core inflation. Responding to the rapid
deterioration in economic conditions, the FOMC cut its
target for the federal funds rate 2-1/2 percentage
points--in 5 half-point steps--by the middle of May.
Moreover, the FOMC indicated throughout this period
that it judged the balance of risks to the outlook as
weighted toward economic weakness. The Board of
Governors of the Federal Reserve System approved
reductions in the discount rate that matched the
Committee's cuts in the target federal funds rate. As a
result, the discount rate declined from 6 percent to
3-1/2 percent over the period.

At its June and August meetings, the FOMC noted
information suggesting continued softening in the
economy and a lack of convincing evidence that the
end of the slide in activity was in sight. Although
consumer spending on both housing and nonhousing
items--buoyed by the tax cuts and rebates, low
mortgage interest rates, declining energy prices, and
realized capital gains from home sales--remained fairly
resilient, economic conditions in manufacturing
deteriorated further. Firms continued to reduce
payrolls, work off excess inventories, and cut back
capital equipment expenditures amid sluggish growth in
business sales, significantly lower corporate profits, and
greater uncertainty about future sales and earnings.
With energy prices in retreat, price inflation remained
subdued. In reaching its policy decisions at its June and
August meetings, the FOMC took into account the
substantial monetary policy stimulus already
implemented since the start of the year--but not yet fully
absorbed by the economy--and the oncoming effects of
stimulative fiscal policy measures recently enacted by
the Congress. Consequently, the Committee opted for
smaller interest rate cuts of 1/4 percentage point at both
the June and August meetings, which brought the target
federal funds rate down to 3-1/2 percent; as earlier in
the year, the FOMC continued to indicate that it judged
the balance of risks to the outlook as weighted toward
economic weakness. After both meetings, the Board of
Governors of the Federal Reserve System also
approved similar reductions in the discount rate, which
moved down to 3 percent.

After the terrorist attacks on September 11, the
available Committee members held a telephone
conference on September 13, during which they agreed
that the financial markets were too disrupted to allow
for an immediate alteration in the stance of monetary
policy. However, the members were in agreement that
the attacks' potential effects on asset prices and on the
performance of the economy, and the resulting
uncertainty, would likely warrant some policy easing in
the very near future. Accordingly, the FOMC, at a
telephone conference on September 17, voted to
reduce its target for the federal funds rate 1/2
percentage point, to 3 percent, and stated that it
continued to judge the risks to the outlook to be
weighted toward economic weakness.

Over subsequent weeks, heightened aversion to risk,
which caused investors to flock from private to
Treasury and federal agency debt, boosted risk
spreads sharply, especially on lower-rated corporate
debt. Increased demand for safe and liquid assets
contributed to selling pressure in the stock market. At
its October 2 meeting, the FOMC had little hard
information available on economic developments since
the attacks. However, evidence gleaned from surveys,
anecdotes, and market contacts indicated that the
events of September 11 had considerable adverse
repercussions on an already weak economy: Survey
indicators of consumer confidence had fallen, and
consumer spending had apparently declined. At the
same time, anecdotal information pointed to additional
deep cutbacks in capital spending by many firms after
an already-significant contraction in business fixed
investment over the summer months.

When the FOMC met on November 6, scattered early
data tended to confirm the information that the decline
in production, employment, and final demand had
steepened after the terrorist attacks. Although an
economic turnaround beginning in the first half of 2002
was a reasonable expectation according to the
Committee, concrete evidence that the economy was
stabilizing had yet to emerge. Meanwhile, the marked
decrease in energy prices since the spring had induced
a decline in overall price inflation, and inflation
expectations had fallen. Accordingly, the FOMC voted
to lower its target for the federal funds rate 1/2
percentage point at both its October and November
meetings and reiterated its view that the risks to the
outlook were weighted toward economic weakness.
The sizable adjustments in the stance of monetary
policy in part reflected concerns that insufficient policy
stimulus posed an unacceptably high risk of a more
extended cyclical retrenchment that could prove
progressively more difficult to counter, given that the
federal funds rate--at 2 percent--was already at such a
low level.

By the time of the December FOMC meeting, the most
recent data were suggesting that the rate of economic
decline might be moderating. After plunging earlier in
the year, orders and shipments of nondefense capital
goods had turned up early in the fourth quarter, and the
most recent survey evidence for manufacturing also
suggested that some expansion in that sector's activity
might be in the offing. In the household sector, personal
consumption expenditures appeared to have been quite
well maintained, an outcome that reflected the
continuation of zero-rate financing packages offered by
the automakers, widespread price discounting, and low
interest rates. In an environment of very low mortgage
interest rates, household demand for housing remained
at a relatively high level, and financial resources freed
up by a rapid pace of mortgage refinancing activity also
supported consumer spending.

Nonetheless, the evidence of emerging stabilization in
the economy was quite tentative and limited, and the
Committee saw subpar economic performance as likely
to persist over the near term. Moreover, in the
probable absence of significant inflationary pressures
for some time, a modest easing action could be
reversed in a timely manner if it turned out not to be
needed. In view of these considerations, the FOMC
lowered its target for the federal funds rate 1/4
percentage point, to 1-3/4 percent, on December 11,
2001, and stated that it continued to judge the risks to
the outlook to be weighted mainly toward economic
weakness. As had been the case throughout the year,
the Board of Governors approved reductions in the
discount rate that matched the FOMC's cuts in the
target federal funds rate, bringing the discount rate to
1-1/4 percent, its lowest level since 1948.

Subsequent news on economic activity bolstered the
view that the economy was beginning to stabilize. The
information reviewed at the January 29-30, 2002,
FOMC meeting indicated that consumer spending had
held up remarkably well, investment orders had firmed
further, and the rate of decline in manufacturing
production had lessened toward the end of 2001. With
weakness in business activity abating, and monetary
policy already having been eased substantially, the
FOMC left the federal funds rate unchanged at the
close of its meeting, but it continued to see the risks to
the outlook as weighted mainly toward economic
weakness.


Economic Projections for 2002

Federal Reserve policymakers are expecting the
economy to begin to recover this year from the mild
downturn experienced in 2001, but the pace of
expansion is not projected to be sufficient to cut into the
margin of underutilized resources. The central tendency
of the real GDP growth forecasts made by the
members of the Board of Governors and the Federal
Reserve Bank presidents is 2-1/2 percent to 3 percent,
measured as the change between the final quarter of
2001 and the final quarter of this year. The pace of
expansion is likely to increase only gradually over the
course of the year, and the unemployment rate is
expected to move higher for a time. The FOMC
members project the civilian unemployment rate to
stand at about 6 percent to 6-1/4 percent at the end of
2002.

A diminution of the rate of inventory liquidation is likely
to be an important factor helping to buoy production
this year. In 2001, businesses cut inventories sharply so
as to avoid carrying excessive stocks relative to the
weaker pace of sales, and although this process of
liquidation probably is not yet complete in many
industries, the overall pace of reduction is likely to
slow. Then, as final demand strengthens, liquidation
should give way to some restocking later in the year.

As noted above, the forces affecting demand this year
are mixed. On the positive side are the stimulative
effects of both fiscal policy and the earlier monetary
policy actions. A gradual turnaround in employment
and a strengthening of the economies of our major
trading partners should provide some lift to final
demand, and spending by both households and
businesses ought to be supported by robust
productivity growth. On the other hand, the problems
facing the high-tech sector have not yet completely
receded, and indications are that spending on other
types of capital equipment remains lackluster. The
surprising strength of household spending through this
period of economic weakness suggests a lack of
pent-up consumer demand going forward. In addition,
consumers likely will not benefit from declining energy
prices to the extent they did last year, and the net
decline in equity values since mid-2000 will probably
continue to weigh on consumption spending in the
period ahead.

Federal Reserve policymakers believe that consumer
prices will increase slightly more rapidly in 2002 than in
2001, as last year's sharp decline in energy prices is
unlikely to be repeated. The central tendency of the
FOMC members' projections for increases in the
chain-type price index for personal consumption
expenditures (PCE) is about 1-1/2 percent; last year's
actual increase was about 1-1/4 percent. Nevertheless,
diminished levels of resource utilization, the indirect
effects of previous declines in energy prices on firms'
costs, and continued competitive pressures all ought to
restrain the pace of price increases outside of the
energy sector this year.



BOX

__________________________________________



Monetary Policy after the Terrorist Attacks

The terrorist attacks on September 11 destroyed a
portion of the infrastructure of U.S. financial markets,
disrupted communication networks, and forced some
market participants to retreat to contingency sites in
varying states of readiness. These developments, along
with the tragic loss of life among the employees of a
few major financial firms, greatly complicated trading,
clearing, and settlement of many different classes of
financial instruments. Direct dislocations elevated
uncertainties about payment flows, making it difficult for
the reserve market to channel funds where they were
needed most. Depositories that held more reserve
balances than they preferred had considerable difficulty
unloading the excess in the market; by contrast,
depositories  awaiting funds had to scramble to cover
overdraft  positions. As a result, the effective demand
for reserves ballooned.

The Federal Reserve accommodated the increase in the
demand for reserves through a variety of means, the
relative importance of which shifted through the week.
On Tuesday morning, shortly after the attacks, the
Federal Reserve issued a press release reassuring
financial markets that the Federal Reserve System was
functioning normally and stating that "the discount
window is available to meet liquidity needs."
Depository institutions took up the offer, and borrowing
surged to a record $45-1/2 billion by Wednesday.
Discount loans outstanding dropped off sharply on
Thursday and returned to very low levels by Friday.
Separately, overnight overdrafts on Tuesday and
Wednesday rose to several billion dollars, as a handful
of depository and other institutions with accounts at the
Federal Reserve were forced into overdraft on their
reserve accounts. Overnight overdrafts returned to
negligible levels by the end of the week.

Like their U.S. counterparts, foreign financial
institutions operating in the United States faced elevated
dollar liquidity needs. In some cases, however, these
institutions encountered difficulties positioning the
collateral at their U.S. branches to secure Federal
Reserve discount window credit. To be in a position to
help meet those needs, three foreign central banks
established new or expanded arrangements with the
Federal Reserve to receive dollars in exchange for their
respective currencies. These swap lines, which lasted
for thirty days, consisted of $50 billion for the European
Central Bank, $30 billion for the Bank of England, and
an increase of $8 billion (from $2 billion to $10 billion)
for the Bank of Canada. The European Central Bank
drew on its line that week to channel the funds to
institutions with a need for dollars.

By Thursday and Friday, the disruption in air traffic
caused the Federal Reserve to extend record levels of
credit to depository institutions in the form of check
float. Float increased dramatically because the Federal
Reserve continued to credit the accounts of banks for
deposited checks even though the grounding of
airplanes meant that checks normally shipped by air
could not be presented to the checkwriters' banks on
the usual schedule. Float declined to normal levels the
following week once air traffic was permitted to
recommence. Lastly, over the course of the week that
included September 11, as the market for reserves
began to function more normally, the Federal Reserve
resumed the use of open market operations to provide
the bulk of reserves. The open market Desk
accommodated all propositions down to the target
federal funds rate, operating exclusively through
overnight transactions for several days. The injection of
reserves through open market operations peaked at
$81 billion on Friday. The combined infusion of liquidity
from the various sources pushed the level of reserve
balances at Federal Reserve Banks to more than $100
billion on Wednesday, September 12, about ten times
the normal level. As anticipated by the FOMC, federal
funds traded somewhat below their new target level for
the rest of the week. By the end of the month,
bid-asked spreads and trading volumes in the interbank
and other markets receded to more normal levels, and
federal funds consistently began to trade around the
intended rate.

The Federal Reserve took several steps to facilitate
market functioning in September in addition to
accommodating the heightened demand for reserves.
The hours of funds and securities transfer systems
operated by the Federal Reserve were extended
significantly for a week after the attacks. The Federal
Reserve Bank of New York liberalized the terms under
which it would lend the securities in the System
portfolio, and the amount of securities lent rose to
record levels in the second half of September. For the
ten days following the attacks, the Federal Reserve
reduced or eliminated the penalty charged on overnight
overdrafts, largely because those overdrafts were
almost entirely the result of extraordinary developments
beyond the control of the account holders. In addition,
the Federal Reserve helped restore communication
between market participants and in some cases
processed bilateral loans of reserves between account
holders in lieu of market intermediation.

END BOX

__________________________________________



SECTION 2

Economic and Financial Developments in 2001 and
Early 2002

In 2001, the economy turned in its weakest
performance in a decade. Real GDP increased at an
annual rate of 3/4 percent in the first half of the year
and, according to the advance estimate from the
Commerce Department, declined at a 1/2 percent
annual rate in the second half. Although the effects of
the weakening economy were broadly felt, the factory
sector was especially hard hit. Faced with slumping
demand both here and abroad, manufacturers cut
production aggressively to limit excessive buildups of
inventories. Moreover, businesses sharply reduced their
investment spending, with particularly dramatic cuts in
outlays for high-technology equipment. By contrast,
household spending was reasonably well maintained,
buoyed by lower interest rates and cuts in federal taxes.
Firms trimmed payrolls through most of the year, and
the unemployment rate moved up nearly 2 percentage
points to around 5-3/4 percent by year-end. Job losses
were especially large following the terrorist attacks of
September 11, which had extremely adverse effects on
certain sectors of the economy--most notably, airline
transportation and hospitality industries. Nevertheless,
by early this year some signs appeared that the
economy was beginning to mend.

Inflation declined last year, pulled down by a sharp
drop in energy prices. Excluding food and energy items,
consumer price inflation leveled off and, by some
measures, moved lower last year. Weakening
economic activity, the indirect effects of declining
energy prices on firms' costs, and continued strong
competitive pressures helped keep a lid on core
consumer price inflation.

The Household Sector

Consumer Spending

Growth in consumer spending slowed last year but
remained sufficiently solid to provide an important
source of support to overall final demand. Personal
consumption expenditures (PCE) increased 3 percent
in real terms in 2001 after having advanced 4-1/4
percent in 2000 and around 5 percent in both 1998 and
1999. The deceleration in consumer spending was
widespread among durable goods, nondurable goods,
and services. However, motor vehicle expenditures
remained strong through most of the year and surged in
the fall as consumers responded enthusiastically to
automakers' aggressive expansion of financing
incentives. After September 11, spending declined in
certain travel- and tourism-related categories, including
air transportation, hotels and motels, and recreation
services such as amusement parks; spending in these
categories has recovered only partially since then.

Last year's downshift in consumption growth reflected
the weakening labor market and associated
deceleration of income as well as the erosion in
household wealth since the middle of 2000. With
employment declining over much of last year, real
personal income rose only about 1-3/4 percent after a
gain of 4-1/2 percent in 2000. The slowing of income
growth was even sharper in nominal terms, but price
declines for gasoline and other energy items in the latter
half of the year substantially cushioned the blow to real
incomes. A continued rise in house prices supported
the wealth position of many households; in the
aggregate, however, household wealth deteriorated
further as equity prices moved lower, on net. The
decline in wealth since mid-2000 likely exerted a
notable restraining influence on household spending last
year.

Both monetary and fiscal policy supported consumer
spending over the past year. Low interest rates helped
enable motor vehicle finance companies to offer
favorable financing on new vehicles. In addition, low
mortgage rates led to a spate of mortgage refinancing
that lasted most of the year, lowering payments and
freeing cash to be used by households for other
spending needs. Indeed, many households apparently
used these refinancings as an opportunity to extract
equity from their homes, a move that further
accommodated consumer spending. Furthermore, the
first wave of tax reductions from the Economic Growth
and Tax Relief Reconciliation Act of 2001--including
the $300 and $600 rebate checks mailed last
summer--likely helped to boost spending in the latter
part of the year. The continued phase-in of the tax
reductions enacted last year should provide further
stimulus to income and consumption this year.

The personal saving rate, which had declined through
1999, leveled off in 2000 and in the first half of 2001.
The saving rate moved erratically in the second half of
the year but rose on average. It shot up in the summer
as households received their tax rebates; it then
declined later in the year as households spent some of
the rebates and as purchases of new motor vehicles
soared in response to the incentives.

Consumer sentiment, as measured by both the
University of Michigan Survey Research Center (SRC)
and the Conference Board, had been running at
extremely high levels through most of 2000 but fell
considerably near the beginning of last year as concerns
about the economy intensified. By the spring, measures
of sentiment leveled off near their historical averages
and well above levels normally associated with
recessions. Sentiment dropped in September. The SRC
measure recovered gradually thereafter, while the
Conference Board index fell further before turning up
later in the year; by early 2002, both sentiment
measures again stood near their historical averages.


Residential Investment

As with consumer spending, real expenditures on
housing were well maintained last year, buoyed by
favorable mortgage interest rates. Interest rates on
thirty-year fixed-rate mortgages, which had been as
high as 8-1/2 percent in the spring of 2000, hovered
around the low level of 7 percent in the first half of
2001. They moved down further to 6-1/2 percent by
late October, before backing up to 7 percent again by
December as prospects for the economy improved. As
monetary policy eased, contract rates on
adjustable-rate mortgages moved down sharply to very
low levels in the fourth quarter and into early 2002.
According to the Michigan SRC survey, declining
mortgage rates have helped elevate consumers'
assessments of homebuying conditions substantially
since mid-2000.

In the single-family sector, 1.27 million new homes
were started last year, 3-1/2 percent more than in
2000, when activity had been held down by higher
mortgage rates. The pace of starts moved up further in
January 2002, in part because of unusually favorable
weather. Furthermore, sizable backlogs of building
permits early this year suggest that construction activity
will remain solid. Sales of new homes were elevated
throughout 2001--indeed, for the year, they were the
highest on record--and sales of existing homes
remained strong as well. Meanwhile, the increase in
home prices moderated last year. The constant-quality
price index of new homes, which attempts to control
for the mix of homes sold, rose only 1-1/2 percent last
year, down from a 6 percent gain in 2000.

In the multifamily sector, starts averaged 328,000 units
last year, a rate close to the solid pace of the past
several years. Conditions are still relatively favorable
for the construction of multifamily units. In particular,
vacancy rates have remained low, although rents and
property values increased at a slower rate last year than
in 2000.


Household Finance

Households continued to borrow at a brisk pace last
year, increasing their debt outstanding an estimated
8-3/4 percent, a rate about 1 percentage point
faster than the average growth over the previous two
years. The cumulative declines in mortgage interest
rates encouraged households to take on large amounts
of mortgage debt, both by fostering homebuying and by
making it attractive to refinance existing mortgages and
extract some of the accumulated equity; indeed, the
Mortgage Bankers Association (MBA) refinancing
index in October reached the highest level since its
inception in January 1980. The frenzied pace of
refinancing activity tailed off some later in the fourth
quarter, when fixed mortgage interest rates backed up.
All told, mortgage debt grew an estimated 9 percent
last year. Strength in durable goods outlays supported
growth in consumer credit (debt not secured by real
estate) in the first quarter of 2001, but as consumption
spending decelerated over the next two quarters, the
expansion of consumer credit slowed sharply.
However, consumer credit growth surged in the fourth
quarter, in large part because of the jump in motor
vehicle sales. For the year as a whole, the rate of
expansion of consumer credit, at 6-1/4 percent, was
well below the 10-1/4 percent rate posted in 2000.

Hefty household borrowing outstripped the growth of
disposable personal income in 2001. As a result,
despite lower interest rates, the household debt-service
burden--an estimate of minimum scheduled payments
on mortgage and consumer debt as a share of
disposable income--finished the year near the peak
recorded at the end of 1986. Measures of household
credit quality deteriorated noticeably last year.
According to the MBA, delinquency rates on home
mortgages continued to trend higher from their historic
lows of the late 1990s, and auto loan delinquencies at
finance companies edged up, although they too
remained at a relatively subdued level. The economic
slowdown and the rise in unemployment significantly
eroded the quality of loans to subprime borrowers, and
delinquency rates for both mortgages and consumer
credit in that segment of the market moved sharply
higher.


The Business Sector

Much of the weakness in activity last year was
concentrated in the business sector. In late 2000,
manufacturers had begun to cut back production in an
effort to reduce an undesired build-up of inventories,
and sharp inventory liquidation continued throughout
last year. Moreover, the boom in capital outlays that
had helped drive the expansion through the late 1990s
gave way to a softening of spending in late 2000 and to
sharp declines last year. Spending dropped for most
types of capital equipment and structures; cutbacks
were especially severe for high-tech equipment, some
types of which may have been over-bought. A sharp
reduction in corporate profits and cash flow contributed
to last year's downturn in capital spending, as did
general uncertainty about the economic outlook.
Despite the reduction in interest rates, which helped
restrain businesses' interest expenses, financing
conditions worsened somewhat, on balance, given
weaker equity values, higher borrowing costs for risky
firms, and some tightening of banks' lending standards.


Fixed Investment

Real spending on equipment and software (E&S)
declined 8-1/2 percent in 2001 after an increase of the
same amount in 2000 and double-digit rates of increase
for several preceding years. Spending on high-tech
equipment, which has accounted for about 40 percent
of E&S spending in recent years, dropped especially
sharply last year. Outlays for computers and peripheral
equipment, which had risen more than 30 percent in
each of the preceding seven years, fell 9 percent in
2001. Spending on communications equipment swung
even more severely, moving from increases of more
than 20 percent on average from 1998 to 2000 to a
decline of more than 30 percent last year. Business
spending on software held up comparatively well, falling
only 2-1/2 percent in 2001 after having risen around 12
percent in 1999 and 2000.

A number of factors may have weighed on outlays for
high-tech equipment, including businesses' decisions to
lengthen the replacement cycle for computers in light of
weak economic conditions and the absence of new
applications requiring the most up-to-date machines.
But in addition, the magnitude by which these
categories of expenditure had increased in preceding
years, together with the abruptness of their downturn,
suggests that firms may have been too optimistic about
the immediate profitability of some types of high-tech
capital; as these expectations were revised, businesses
viewed their previous investment as more than sufficient
to meet anticipated demand. This possibility is
especially likely in the case of communications
equipment, for which expectations about prospects for
growth in demand appear to have been disappointed.
Some of the cutbacks may have reflected a general
pulling back in an environment of greater uncertainty.
The sharp rise and subsequent decline of equity values
in the high-tech sector mirrors the pattern of rising and
slowing investment and provides some support for the
notion that earnings expectations may have been overly
upbeat in the past.

Under the influence of ongoing weakness in the market
for heavy trucks, business spending on motor vehicles
declined through most of the year. But spending
stabilized in the fourth quarter, as the generous
incentives on motor vehicles may have helped boost
spending by small businesses as well as consumers.
Domestic orders for new aircraft declined last year,
especially after the terrorist attacks last fall, but these
lower orders had not yet affected spending by year-end
because of the very long lags involved in producing
planes. Apart from spending on transportation and
high-tech equipment, real outlays declined 7-1/2
percent last year after having increased 6 percent in
2000, with the turnaround driven by a sharp swing in
spending on many types of industrial machinery and on
office furniture.

Late last year, conditions in some segments of the
high-tech sector showed signs of bottoming.
Developments in the semiconductor industry have
improved, with production increasing during the fall.
Some of the improvement is apparently coming from
increased demand for computers. In the advance
estimate from the Commerce Department for the fourth
quarter, real spending on computers and peripheral
equipment was reported to have surged at an annual
rate of 40 percent. However, spending on
communications equipment, for which evidence of a
capital overhang has been most pronounced, continued
to decline sharply in the fourth quarter, and orders for
communications equipment have yet to display any
convincing signs of turning around. As for other types
of capital equipment, spending continued to decline in
the fourth quarter, but a moderate rebound in new
orders for many types of capital goods from their
autumn lows hinted that a broader firming of demand
may be under way.

Real business spending for nonresidential structures
also declined sharply in 2001. Construction of office
buildings dropped last year after having increased
notably for several years; industrial building remained
fairly steady through the first half of last year but
plummeted in the second half. Vacancy rates for these
two types of properties rose considerably, and by
year-end the industrial vacancy rate had reached its
highest level since mid-1993. Meanwhile, spending on
non-office commercial buildings (a category that
includes retail, wholesale, and some warehouse space)
decreased moderately last year. Investment in public
utilities moved down as well, a decline reflecting, in
part, a cutback in spending for communications
projects such as the installation of fiber-optic networks.
Investment in the energy sector was a pocket of
strength last year. Construction of drilling structures
surged in 2000 and much of 2001, as the industry
responded to elevated prices of oil and natural gas.
However, with oil and natural gas prices reversing their
earlier increases, drilling activity turned down in the
latter part of the year.


Inventory Investment

By late 2000, manufacturers were already cutting
production to slow the pace of inventory accumulation
as inventories moved up relative to sales. Production
cuts intensified in early 2001, and producers and
distributers liquidated inventories at increasing rates
throughout the year. The runoff of inventories was a
major factor holding down GDP growth last year.
Indeed, the arithmetic subtraction from real GDP
growth attributable to the decline in nonfarm inventory
investment was 1-1/2 percentage points over the four
quarters of 2001. However, because sales also were
weakening, inventory-sales ratios remained high in
much of the manufacturing sector, and in some portions
of the wholesale sector as well, throughout the year.

The motor vehicle sector accounted for about
one-quarter of last year's overall inventory drawdown.
Late in 2000 and early last year, automakers cut
production in an attempt to clear out excess stocks held
by dealers. By the spring, vehicle assemblies had
stabilized, and the automakers instead dealt with heavy
stocks by further sweetening incentives to boost sales.
By the end of the year, inventories of cars and light
trucks stood at a relatively lean 2-1/4 million units,
nearly 1 million units fewer than were held a year
earlier.


Corporate Profits and Business Finance

The profitability of the U.S. nonfinancial corporate
sector suffered a severe blow in 2001. The profit slump
had begun in the fourth quarter of the previous year,
when the economic profits of nonfinancial
corporations--that is, book profits from current
production with inventory and capital consumption
adjustments compiled by the Commerce
Department--plummeted almost 45 percent at an
annual rate. The first three quarters of 2001 brought
little respite, and economic profits spiraled downward
at an average annual rate of 25 percent. The ratio of the
profits of nonfinancial corporations to the sector's gross
nominal output fell to 7-1/2 percent last year, a level
not seen since the early 1980s. Earnings reports for the
fourth quarter indicate that nonfinancial corporate
profits continued to fall late in the year.

Business borrowing slowed markedly last year because
firms slashed investment in fixed capital and inventories
even more than the drop in profits and other internally
generated funds. Business debt expanded at a 6-1/4
percent annual rate in 2001, well below the
double-digit rates of the two previous years, and its
composition shifted decidedly toward longer-term
sources of funds. Early in the year, favorable conditions
in the corporate bond market, combined with firms'
desire to lock in low interest rates, prompted
investment-grade firms to issue a high volume of bonds.
They used the proceeds to strengthen their balance
sheets by repaying short-term debt obligations,
refinancing other longer-term debt, and building up
liquid assets. Junk bond issuance was also strong early
in 2001, as speculative-grade yields fell in response to
monetary policy easings, although investors shunned the
riskiest issues amid increasing economic uncertainty and
rising defaults among below-investment-grade
borrowers.

The heavy pace of bond issuance, along with a reduced
need to finance capital investments, enabled firms to
decrease their business loans at banks and their
commercial paper outstanding. The move out of
commercial paper also reflected elevated credit
spreads between high- and low-tier issuers resulting
from the defaults of California utilities and several debt
downgrades among prominent firms early in the year.
Announcements of new equity share repurchase
programs thinned considerably in the first half of the
year, as firms sought to conserve their cash buffers in
response to plummeting profits. A significant slowdown
in cash-financed merger activity further damped equity
retirements, although these retirements still outpaced
gross equity issuance, which was restrained by falling
share prices. Over the summer, issuance of
investment-grade bonds dropped off appreciably.
Moreover, market sentiment toward speculative-grade
issues cooled, as further erosion in that sector's credit
quality took its toll. Business loans and outstanding
commercial paper continued to contract, and with share
prices in the doldrums, nonfinancial firms raised only a
small amount of funds in public equity markets in the
third quarter.

The terrorist attacks on September 11 constricted
corporate financing flows for a time. The stock market
closed for that week, and trading in corporate bonds
came to a virtual halt. After the shutdown of the stock
market, the Securities and Exchange Commission, in an
effort to ensure adequate liquidity, temporarily lifted
some restrictions on firms' repurchases of their own
shares. According to reports from dealers, this change
triggered a spate of repurchases in the first few days
after the stock markets reopened on September 17.
When full-scale trading in corporate bonds resumed
on September 17, credit spreads on corporate bonds
widened sharply: Risk spreads on speculative-grade
private debt soared to levels not seen since late 1991,
and spreads on investment-grade corporate bonds also
moved higher, although by a considerably smaller
amount. Against this backdrop, junk bond issuance
nearly dried up for the rest of the month. Commercial
paper rates--even for top-tier issuers--jumped
immediately after the attacks, as risk of payment delays
increased. In response to elevated rates, some issuers
tapped their backup lines at commercial banks, and
business loans spiked in the weeks after the attacks.
Risk spreads for low-tier borrowers in the commercial
paper market remained elevated, even after market
operations had largely recovered, because of ongoing
concerns about credit quality and ratings downgrades
among some high-profile issuers in the fall.

By early October, the investment-grade corporate
bond market had largely recovered from the disruptions
associated with the terrorist attacks, and bond issuance
in that segment of the market picked up considerably.
Firms capitalized on relatively low longer-term interest
rates to pay down short-term obligations, to refinance
existing higher-coupon debt, and to boost their holdings
of liquid assets. With high-yield bond risk spreads
receding moderately, issuance in the speculative-grade
segment of the corporate bond market stirred
somewhat from its moribund state, although investors
remained highly selective. Public equity issuance, after
stalling in September, also regained some ground in the
fourth quarter, spurred by a rebound in stock prices.
As was the case for most of the year, initial public
offerings and venture capital financing remained at
depressed levels.

Commercial paper issuance recovered somewhat early
in the fourth quarter as firms repaid bank loans made in
the immediate aftermath of the terrorist attacks and as
credit spreads for lower-rated issuers started to
narrow. However, the collapse of the Enron
Corporation combined with typical year-end pressures
to widen quality spreads in early December. All told,
the volume of domestic nonfinancial commercial paper
outstanding shrank by one-third over the year as a
whole. Business loans at banks fell further in the fourth
quarter; for the year, business loans contracted 4-1/4
percent, their first annual decline since 1993.

The slowing of sales and the drop in profits caused
corporate credit quality to deteriorate noticeably last
year. In part because of the decline in market interest
rates, the ratio of net interest payments to cash flow in
the nonfinancial corporate sector moved only modestly
above the relatively low levels of recent years, and
most firms did not experience significant difficulties
servicing their debt. However, many firms were
downgraded, and evidence of financial distress
mounted over the course of the year. The twelve-month
trailing average of the default rate on corporate bonds
nearly tripled last year and by December ran almost 1/2
percentage point higher than its peak in 1991.
Delinquency rates on business loans at banks also rose,
although not nearly as dramatically. The amount of
nonfinancial debt downgraded by Moody's Investors
Service last year was more than five times the amount
upgraded; downgrades were especially pronounced in
the fourth quarter, when ratings agencies lowered debt
ratings of firms in the telecommunication, energy, and
auto sectors.

Commercial mortgage debt, supported by still-strong
construction spending, expanded at a brisk 10 percent
pace over the first half of 2001. The growth of
commercial mortgage debt edged down only 1/2
percentage point in the second half, despite a sharp
slowdown in business spending on nonresidential
structures. As a result, the issuance of
commercial-mortgage-backed securities (CMBS)
maintained a robust pace throughout the year. Available
data indicate some deterioration in the quality of
commercial real estate credit. Delinquency rates on
commercial real estate loans at banks rose steadily in
2001 and have started to edge out of their recent
record-low range. In addition, CMBS delinquency
rates increased, especially toward the end of the year,
amid the rise in office vacancy rates. Despite the
erosion in credit quality in commercial real estate and
heavy issuance of CMBS, yield spreads on
investment-grade CMBS over swap rates were about
unchanged over the year, suggesting that investors view
credit problems in this sector as being contained.
Commercial banks, however, stiffened their lending
posture in response to eroding prospects for the
commercial real estate sector; significant net fractions of
loan officers surveyed over the course of the year
reported that their institutions had firmed standards on
commercial real estate loans.


The Government Sector

Federal Government

Deteriorating economic conditions and new fiscal
initiatives have led to smaller federal budget surpluses
than had been anticipated earlier. The fiscal 2001
surplus on a unified basis was $127 billion, or about
1-1/4 percent of GDP--well below both the record
$236 billion surplus recorded in fiscal 2000 and the
$281 billion surplus that the Congressional Budget
Office had anticipated for fiscal 2001 at this time last
year. Receipts, which had increased at least 6 percent
in each of the preceding seven fiscal years, declined
around 2 percent in fiscal 2001; the rise in individual tax
receipts slowed dramatically and corporate receipts
plunged 27 percent. The lower receipts reflected both
the weakening economy--specifically, slow growth of
personal income, the drop in corporate profits, and a
pattern of declines in equity values that led to lower net
capital gains realizations--and changes associated with
the Economic Growth and Tax Relief Reconciliation
Act of 2001. Some provisions of the act went into
effect immediately, including the rebate checks that
were mailed last summer. In addition, the act shifted
some corporate tax payments into fiscal 2002.

Meanwhile, outlays were up 4 percent in fiscal 2001;
abstracting from a decline in net interest payments,
outlays increased nearly 6 percent, a second year of
increases larger than had prevailed for some time.
Outlays have increased across all major categories of
expenditure, including defense, Medicare and
Medicaid, and social security. As for the part of federal
spending that is counted in GDP, real federal outlays
for consumption and gross investment increased
somewhat more rapidly than in recent years through the
first three quarters of 2001 as defense expenditures
picked up. Spending rose faster still in the fourth
quarter because of increases for homeland security and
the additional costs associated with the war in
Afghanistan.

The existence of surpluses through fiscal 2001 meant
that the federal government continued to contribute to
the pool of national saving. Nevertheless, gross saving
by households, businesses, and governments has been
trending down over the past few years from the recent
high of around 19 percent of GDP in 1998.

The Treasury used federal budget surpluses over the
first half of the year to pay down its outstanding
marketable debt. In the third quarter, however, the cut
in personal income taxes and a weakening in receipts as
the economy contracted led the Treasury to reenter the
credit markets as a significant borrower of new funds.
The Treasury's budget position swung back into surplus
late in the year owing to somewhat
stronger-than-expected tax receipts, which helped push
fourth-quarter net borrowing below its third-quarter
level. Despite the increase in the Treasury's net
borrowing over the second half of the year, publicly
held debt remained at only about one-third of nominal
GDP last year, its lowest level since the mid-1980s and
well below the 1993 peak of almost 50 percent.

The terrorist attacks on September 11 and the
associated disruptions to financial markets had some
spillover effects on Treasury financing. On the day of
the attacks, the Treasury cancelled its scheduled bill
auction; over the next several days, it drew down
nearly all of its compensating balances with commercial
banks--about $12-1/2 billion in total--to meet its
obligations. On Thursday of that week, the settlement
of securities sold the day before the attacks eased the
Treasury's immediate cash squeeze, and the incoming
stream of estimated quarterly personal income tax
payments provided additional funds. Infrastructure
problems involving the trading and clearing of Treasury
securities were largely resolved over the following
week, and when the Treasury resumed its regular bill
issuance on September 17, exceptionally strong
demand for bills pushed stop-out rates--that is, the
highest yield accepted during the auction--to their
lowest level since 1961. Although the Treasury
cancelled debt buybacks scheduled for late September
to conserve cash, it later announced that buyback
operations would begin again in October.

With its credit needs still limited, the Treasury
announced on October 31 that it was suspending
issuance of nominal and inflation-indexed thirty-year
securities. Subsequently, the thirty-year Treasury bond
yield fell sharply, bid-asked spreads on outstanding
bonds widened, and liquidity in the bond sector
deteriorated. Although bid-asked spreads narrowed
over the balance of the year, market participants
reported that liquidity in the bond sector remained
below its level before the Treasury's announcement.
The announcement on October 31 also indicated that
after the January 2002 buyback operations, the
Treasury would determine the amount and timing of
buybacks on a quarter-by-quarter basis, thereby fueling
speculation that future buybacks might be scaled back
in light of the changed budget outlook.


State and Local Governments

Real expenditures for consumption and gross
investment by states and localities rose 5 percent last
year after an increase of 2-1/2 percent in 2000. Much
of the acceleration reflected a burst of spending on
construction of schools and other infrastructure needs.
In addition, outlays at the end of last year were boosted
by the cleanup from the September 11 attacks in New
York. As for employment, state and local governments
added jobs in 2001 at a more rapid pace than they did
over the previous year and thereby helped to offset job
losses in the private sector.

The fiscal condition of state and local governments has
been strained by the deterioration in economic
performance. State governments are considering a
variety of actions to achieve budget balance in the
current fiscal year. Most states are intending to cut
planned expenditures, and many are considering
drawing down rainy-day funds, which governments had
built up in earlier years. According to the National
Conference of State Legislators, these rainy-day funds
stood at the relatively high level of $23 billion at the
end of fiscal 2001 (June 30). Moreover, some states
that had planned to fund capital expenditures with
current receipts appear to be shifting to debt financing.
Finally, a few states are considering actions such as
postponing tax cuts that were enacted earlier.

Debt of the state and local government sector
expanded rapidly last year after slow growth in 2000.
Gross issuance of long-term municipal bonds
accelerated over the first half of 2001 as state and local
governments took advantage of lower yields to refund
outstanding debt. Spurred by falling interest rates and
declining tax revenues, these governments continued to
issue long-term bonds to finance new capital projects at
a rapid clip over the second half of the year. Despite a
deterioration in tax receipts, credit quality in the
municipal market remained high in 2001. Late in the
year, however, signs of weakness had emerged, as the
pace of net credit-ratings upgrades slowed noticeably.
Especially significant problems continue to plague
California and New York, both of which saw their debt
ratings lowered in November. In California, the
problems were attributed to declining tax revenues and
difficulties related to the state's electricity crisis earlier in
the year, while New York's slip in credit quality
resulted not only from deteriorating tax receipts but also
from fears of higher-than-expected costs related to
clean up and rebuilding after the terrorist attacks.


The External Sector

Trade and the Current Account

The U.S. current account deficit narrowed significantly
during 2001, with both imports and exports of goods
and services falling sharply in response to a global
weakening of economic activity. The deficit in goods
and services narrowed to $333 billion at an annual rate
in the fourth quarter of 2001 from $401 billion at the
end of the previous year. In addition, the deficit was
temporarily reduced further in the third quarter because
service import payments were lowered by a large
one-time estimated insurance payment from foreign
insurers (reported on an accrual basis) related to the
events of September 11.<footnote 1> Excluding the estimated
insurance figure, the current account deficit was $434
billion at an annual rate over the first three quarters of
the year, or 4-1/4 percent of GDP, compared with
$445 billion and 4-1/2 percent for the year 2000. Net
investment income payments were about the same
during the first three quarters of 2001 as in the
corresponding period a year earlier; higher net
payments on our growing net portfolio liability position
were offset by higher net direct investment receipts.

U.S. real exports were hit by slower growth abroad,
continued appreciation of the dollar, and plunging
global demand for high-tech products. Real exports of
goods and services fell 11 percent over the four
quarters of 2001, with double-digit declines beginning
in the second quarter. Service receipts decreased 7
percent; all of the decline came after the events of
September 11. Receipts from travel and passenger
fares, which plunged following the terrorist attacks,
were about one-fourth lower in the fourth quarter than
in the second quarter. Receipts from foreigners for
other services changed little over the year. Exports
declined in almost all major goods categories, with the
largest drops by far in high-tech capital goods and
other machinery. Two exceptions were exports of
automotive products, which rose during the second and
third quarters (largely parts to Canada and Mexico
destined ultimately for use in U.S. markets, and vehicles
to Canada), and agricultural goods. About 45 percent
of U.S. exports of goods were capital equipment; 20
percent were industrial supplies; and 5 percent to 10
percent each were agricultural, automotive, consumer,
and other goods. The value of exported goods declined
at double-digit rates for almost all major market
destinations. Even exports to Canada and Mexico
declined sharply, despite support from two-way trade
with the United States in such sectors as automotive
products.

As growth of the U.S. economy slowed noticeably, real
imports of goods and services turned down and
declined 8 percent for 2001 as a whole. Service
payments dropped 15 percent last year. The plunge in
outlays for travel and passenger fares after September
11 held down total real service payments, bringing their
level in the fourth quarter 15 percent below that in the
second quarter. Spending on services other than travel
and passenger fares changed little during the year.<footnote 2>
Imported goods fell 6 percent last year, with much of
the decrease in capital goods (computers,
semiconductors, and other machinery). In contrast, real
imports of automotive products, consumer goods, oil,
and other industrial supplies were little changed, and
imports of foods rose. The pattern of import growth
appears to have shifted toward the end of the year.
Imports of real non-oil goods declined at about a 10
percent annual rate during the first three quarters of the
year but fell less rapidly in the fourth quarter. The price
of imported non-oil goods, after rising in the first
quarter, declined at an annual rate of about 6 percent
from the second quarter through the fourth quarter, led
by decreases in the price of imported industrial
supplies.

The value of imported oil fell more than one-third over
the four quarters of 2001, a drop resulting almost
entirely from a sharp decline in oil prices. The spot
price of West Texas intermediate (WTI) crude
decreased about $10 per barrel during the year, with
much of the decline occurring after September 11.
During the first eight months of 2001, the spot price of
WTI averaged $28 per barrel as weakened demand
for oil and increased non-OPEC supply were
largely offset by OPEC production restraint. In the
wake of the terrorist attacks, oil prices dropped sharply
in response to a decline in jet fuel consumption, weaker
economic activity, and reassurance from Saudi Arabia
that supply would be forthcoming. Oil prices continued
to drift lower during the fourth quarter, reflecting
OPEC's apparent unwillingness to continue to sacrifice
market share in order to defend higher oil prices. In late
December, however, OPEC worked out an
arrangement in which it agreed to reduce its production
targets an additional 1.5 million barrels per day,
contingent on the pledges from several non-OPEC
producers (Angola, Mexico, Norway, Oman, and
Russia) to reduce oil exports a total of 462,500 barrels
per day. Given the uncertainty over the extent to which
these reductions will actually be implemented and the
comfortable level of oil inventories, the spot price of
WTI remained near $20 per barrel in early 2002.


Financial Account

The slowing of U.S. and foreign economic growth over
the course of last year had noticeable effects on the
composition of U.S. capital flows, especially when the
slowing became more pronounced in the second half.
On balance, net private capital flowed in at a pace only
slightly below the record set in 2000, including
unprecedented net inflows through private securities
transactions.

During the first half of 2001, sagging stock prices and
signs of slower growth brought a shift in the types of
U.S. securities demanded by private foreigners but did
not reduce the overall demand for them. Indeed, during
the first half, foreign private purchases of U.S. securities
averaged $137 billion per quarter, a rate well above the
record $109 billion pace set in 2000. A slowing of
foreign purchases of U.S. equities, relative to 2000,
was more than offset by a pickup in foreign purchases
of corporate and agency bonds. In addition, private
foreigners, who had sold a significant quantity of
Treasury securities during 2000, roughly halted their
sales in the first half of 2001. The increased capital
inflows arising from larger foreign purchases of U.S.
securities in the first half was only partly offset by an
increase in the pace at which U.S. residents acquired
foreign securities, especially equities.

The pattern of private securities transactions changed
significantly in the third quarter: Foreign purchases of
U.S. equities slowed markedly, and U.S. investors
shifted from net purchases of foreign securities to net
sales. However, the reduced flows in the third quarter
seem to have reflected short-lived reactions to events in
the quarter. Preliminary data for the fourth quarter
show a significant bounceback in foreign purchases of
U.S. securities and a return to purchases of foreign
securities by U.S. residents.

The changing economic climate also affected direct
investment capital flows. During 2000, foreign direct
investment in the United States averaged more than
$70 billion per quarter. These flows slowed to less than
$60 billion per quarter in the first half and then dropped
to only $26 billion in the third quarter (the last available
data). The drop resulted in part from a decline in the
outlook for corporate profits and a significant reduction
in general merger and acquisition activity. By contrast,
U.S. direct investment abroad picked up over the
course of 2001. The third quarter outflow of $52
billion--a record--reflected both a large merger and
robust retained earnings by the foreign affiliates of U.S.
firms. Capital inflows from official sources were
relatively modest in 2001, totaling only $15 billion,
compared with $36 billion in 2000.


The Labor Market

Employment and Unemployment

Last year's weakening in economic activity took its toll
on the labor market. Payroll employment edged up
early last year and then dropped nearly 1-1/2 million by
January 2002. Declines were particularly large in
manufacturing, which has shed one in twelve jobs since
mid-2000. Job cuts accelerated in the months following
the terrorist attacks of September 11, with declines
occurring in a wide variety of industries. The
unemployment rate moved up from 4 percent in late
2000 to 5.8 percent by December 2001. In January
2002, the unemployment rate edged down to 5.6
percent.

Early last year, employment in manufacturing, which
had been trending down for several years, began to
decline more rapidly. Job losses were widespread
within the manufacturing sector but were most
pronounced in durable-goods industries, such as those
producing electrical and industrial machinery and
metals. Employment at help supply firms and in
wholesale trade--industries that are directly related to
manufacturing--also began to decline. Outside of
manufacturing and its related industries, private payrolls
continued to increase robustly in the first quarter of last
year, but hiring then slowed, although it remained
positive, on net, in the second and third quarters.
Construction payrolls increased into the spring but
flattened out thereafter. Employment at retail trade
establishments also continued to increase moderately
through the spring but began to decline in the late
summer. In services industries other than help supply
firms--a broad group that accounted for nearly half of
the private payroll increases over the preceding several
years--job gains slowed but remained positive in the
second and third quarters of last year. In all, private
payroll employment declined about 115,000 per month
in the second and third quarters, and the unemployment
rate moved up steadily to 4-1/2 percent by the spring
and to nearly 5 percent by August.

The labor market was especially hard hit by the
terrorist attacks. Although labor demand was weak
prior to the attacks, the situation turned far worse
following the events of September 11, and private
payrolls plunged more than 400,000 per month on
average in October and November. Employment fell
substantially not only in manufacturing and in industries
directly affected by the attacks, such as air
transportation, hotels, and restaurants, but also in a
wide variety of other industries such as construction
and much of the retail sector.

Employment continued to decline in December and
January but much less than in the preceding two
months. Manufacturing and its related industries lost
jobs at a slower pace, and employment leveled off in
other private industries. The unemployment rate moved
up to 5.8 percent in December but then ticked down to
5.6 percent in January. The recent reversal of the
October and November spikes in new claims for
unemployment insurance and in the level of insured
unemployment also point to some improvement in labor
market conditions early this year.


Productivity and Labor Costs

Given economic conditions, growth of labor
productivity was impressive in 2001. Productivity
growth typically drops when the economy softens,
partly because businesses tend not to shed workers in
proportion to reduced demand. Last year, however,
output per hour in the nonfarm business sector
increased a relatively solid 1-1/2 percent, according to
the advance estimate, after having risen 2-1/2 percent
in 2000--a mild deceleration by past cyclical standards.
Indeed, productivity is estimated to have increased at
an annual rate of more than 2 percent in the second half
of the year, an impressive performance during a period
when real GDP was, on net, contracting. The buoyancy
of productivity during 2001 provides further support to
the view that the underlying trend of productivity
growth has stepped up notably in recent years.

Hourly labor compensation costs increased more
slowly last year than in 2000, although different
compensation measures paint different pictures of the
magnitude of that deceleration. The slowing likely
reflected the influence of the soft labor market,
energy-driven declines in price inflation toward the
latter part of the year, and subdued inflation
expectations. Compensation probably was also held
down by a reduction in variable pay, such as bonuses
that are tied to company performance and stock-option
activity.

According to the employment cost index, hourly
compensation costs increased 4-1/4 percent during
2001, down from a 4-1/2 percent increase in 2000;
both the wages and salaries and benefits components
recorded slightly smaller increases. The deceleration in
the index for wages and salaries was concentrated
among sales workers, whose wages often include a
substantial commission component and so are
especially sensitive to cyclical developments.
Although the increase in employers' cost of benefits
slowed overall, the cost of providing health insurance
increased more than 9 percent last year; the rise
continued this component's accelerating contribution to
labor costs over the past few years after a period of
restrained cost increases in the mid-1990s.

An alternative measure of hourly compensation is the
BLS's measure of compensation per hour in the
nonfarm business sector, which is derived from
compensation information in the national accounts; this
measure increased 4 percent last year, a very large
drop from the 7-3/4 percent increase registered in
2000. One reason that these two compensation
measures may diverge is that only nonfarm
compensation per hour captures the cost of stock
options. Although the two compensation measures
differ in numerous other respects as well, the much
sharper deceleration in nonfarm compensation per hour
may indicate that stock option exercises leveled off or
declined in 2001 in response to the fall in equity values.
However, because nonfarm compensation per hour can
be revised substantially, one must be cautious in
interpreting the most recent quarterly figures from this
series.

Unit labor costs, the ratio of hourly compensation to
output per hour in the nonfarm business sector,
increased about 2 percent last year. Although down
from a huge 5 percent increase in 2000 that reflected
that year's surge in nonfarm compensation per hour, the
figure for 2001 is still a little higher than the moderate
increases seen over the preceding several years. Last
year's increase in unit labor costs was held up by the
smaller productivity increases that accompanied weak
economic activity; accordingly, subsequent increases in
unit labor costs would be held down if output per hour
begins to increase more rapidly as the economy
strengthens.


Prices

Inflation declined in 2001 largely because of a steep
drop in energy prices. The chain-type price index for
personal consumption expenditures (PCE) increased
1.3 percent last year after having increased 2.6 percent
in 2000; the turnaround in consumer energy prices
accounted for almost all of that deceleration. Increases
in PCE prices excluding food and energy items also
slowed a little last year after having moved up in 2000.
The chain-type price index for gross domestic
purchases--the broadest price measure for domestically
purchased goods and services--decelerated
considerably last year. The small increase in this index
reflected both the drop in energy prices and a
resumption of rapid declines for prices of investment
goods, especially computers, following a period of
unusual firmness in 2000. The price index for GDP--the
broadest price measure for domestically produced
goods and services--posted a smaller deceleration of
about 1/2 percentage point between 2000 and 2001
because lower oil prices have a smaller weight in U.S.
production than in U.S. purchases.

Consumer energy prices continued to move higher
through the early months of 2001 before turning down
sharply in the second half of the year. Despite the fact
that crude oil prices were declining over the first half of
the year, retail gasoline prices increased at an annual
rate of 8 percent during that period. The sizable
increase in margins on gasoline reflected both refinery
disruptions and low inventory levels going into the
summer driving season. But gasoline prices fell sharply
thereafter as refineries came back on line, imports of
gasoline picked up, and crude oil prices moved
considerably lower over the latter half of the year. In
all, gasoline prices were down 19 percent over the year
as a whole. Heating oil prices reflected crude oil
developments more directly and declined sharply
through most of the year. Meanwhile, spot prices of
natural gas peaked in January 2001 at the
extraordinarily high level of nearly $10 per million
BTUs, and prices at the consumer level continued to
surge in the first few months of the year. These
increases reflected the pressure from ongoing strength
in demand coupled with unusually cold weather early
last winter that left stocks at very low levels. But the
situation improved as expanded supply allowed stocks
to be replenished: Spot prices reversed those earlier
increases, and prices of consumer natural gas declined
substantially through the rest of the year.

In contrast, electricity prices rose through most of last
year. The increases reflected the effects of the earlier
rises in the prices of natural gas and coal on fuel costs
of utilities as well as problems with electricity generation
in California. California was able to avoid serious
power disruptions last summer because high electricity
prices, weak economic activity, and moderate weather
all helped keep demand in check.

Consumer food prices increased more rapidly last year,
rising about 3 percent after having risen only 2-1/2
percent in 2000. Early in the year, strong demand, both
domestic and foreign, led to large increases in livestock
prices--especially beef. But these prices softened later
in the year under the influence of higher supplies, lower
domestic demand, and foreign outbreaks of mad cow
disease, which apparently damped demand for beef no
matter where produced.

Excluding food and energy items, PCE prices rose 1.6
percent last year, a small deceleration from its 1.9
percent increase over 2000. That deceleration was
concentrated in prices of goods, with prices especially
soft for motor vehicles and apparel. By contrast, prices
of many services continued to accelerate last year. In
particular, shelter costs--which include residential rent,
the imputed rent of owner-occupied housing, and hotel
and motel prices--increased 4-1/4 percent last year
after having risen 3-1/2 percent in 2000.

Standing somewhat in contrast to the small deceleration
in core PCE prices, the core consumer price index
(CPI) increased 2-3/4 percent last year, about the
same rate as in 2000. Although components of the CPI
are key inputs of the PCE price index, the two price
measures differ in a variety of ways. One important
difference is that the PCE measure is broader in scope;
it includes expenditures made by nonprofit institutions
and consumption of items such as checking services
that banks provide without explicit charge. Prices for
the PCE categories that are outside the scope of the
CPI decelerated notably in 2001 and accounted for
much of the differential movements of inflation
measured by the two price indexes. Another difference
is that the CPI places a larger weight on housing than
does the PCE price index, and last year's acceleration
of housing prices therefore boosted the CPI relative to
the PCE measure.

The leveling off or decline in core consumer price
inflation reflects a variety of factors, including the
weakening of economic activity and the accompanying
slackening of resource utilization; the decline in energy
prices that reduced firms' costs; and continuing intense
competitive pressures in product markets. These
factors also likely helped to reduce inflation
expectations late last year, and this reduction itself may
be contributing to lower inflation. According to the
Michigan SRC, median one-year inflation expectations,
which had held near 3 percent through 2000 and into
last summer, moved down to 2-3/4 percent in the third
quarter and plummeted to 1 percent or lower in
October and November. Falling energy prices and
widespread reports of discounting following the
September 11 attacks likely played a role in causing
this sharp break in expectations. Part of this drop was
reversed in December, and since then, inflation
expectations have remained around 2 percent--a rate
still well below the levels that had prevailed earlier.
Meanwhile, the Michigan SRC's measure of
longer-term inflation expectations, which had also
remained close to 3 percent through 2000 and the first
half of 2001, ticked down to 2-3/4 percent in October
and stood at that level early this year.


U.S. Financial Markets

As a consequence of the Federal Reserve's aggressive
easing of the stance of monetary policy in 2001, interest
rates on short- and intermediate-term Treasury
securities fell substantially over the course of the year.
Longer-term Treasury bond yields, however, ended the
year about unchanged, on balance. These rates had
already fallen appreciably in late 2000 in anticipation of
monetary policy easing. They may also have been held
up last year by an increased likelihood of federal
budget deficits and, except in the immediate aftermath
of the terrorist attacks, by investors' optimism about
future economic prospects. Despite this optimism, the
slowdown in final demand, a slump in corporate
earnings, and a marked deterioration in credit quality of
businesses in a number of sectors made investors more
wary about risk. Although interest rates on higher-rated
investment- grade corporate bonds generally moved in
line with those on comparably dated government
securities, lower-rated firms found credit to be
considerably more expensive, as risk spreads on
speculative-grade debt soared for most of the year
before narrowing somewhat over the last few months.
Interest rates on commercial paper and business loans
fell last year by about as much as the federal funds rate,
but risk spreads generally remained in the elevated
range. In addition, commercial banks tightened
standards and terms for business borrowers throughout
the year. Equity prices were exceptionally volatile and
fell further, on balance, in 2001.

Increased caution on the part of lenders did not appear
to materially damp aggregate credit flows. Private
borrowing was robust last year, especially when
compared with the marked slowing in nominal
spending. Relatively low long-term interest rates
encouraged both businesses and households to
concentrate borrowing in longer-term instruments,
thereby locking in lower debt-service obligations. The
proceeds of long-term borrowing were also used to
strengthen balance sheets by building stocks of liquid
assets. A shift toward safer and more liquid asset
holdings showed through in rapid growth of M2, which
was spurred further by reduced short-term market
interest rates and elevated stock market volatility.


Interest Rates

Short-term market interest rates moved down with the
FOMC's cumulative cut in the target federal funds rate
of 4-3/4 percentage points, and yields on
intermediate-term Treasury securities declined almost 2
percentage points. Longer-term interest rates had
already fallen in the latter part of 2000, when investors
began to anticipate significant policy easing in response
to weakening economic growth. As the FOMC
aggressively eased the stance of monetary policy during
the winter and spring, investors' expectations of a
prompt revival in economic activity took hold and were
manifested in a sharp upward tilt of money market
futures rates and an appreciable rise in longer-term
interest rates over the second quarter. However, signs
of the anticipated economic turnaround failed to
materialize as the summer progressed. Indeed, the
weakening in economic activity was becoming more
widespread, which prompted expectations of further
monetary policy easing over the near term, and
longer-term interest rates turned down again.

The terrorist attacks of September 11 dramatically
redrew the picture of the nation's near-term economic
prospects. Market participants lowered markedly their
expected trajectory for the path of the federal funds
rate in the immediate aftermath of the attacks, and
revisions to policy expectations, combined with
considerable flight-to-safety demands, cut short- and
intermediate-term Treasury yields substantially over
subsequent days. The FOMC, confronted with
evidence of additional weakness in final demand and
prices, eased policy further over the balance of the
year, and short-term market interest rates continued to
decline. In early November, however, intermediate-
and long-term interest rates turned up, as it became
apparent that the economic fallout from the attacks
would be more limited than some had originally feared,
and as military success in Afghanistan bolstered
investors' confidence and moderated safe-haven
demands. By the end of the year, yields on
intermediate-term Treasury securities had reversed
about half of their post-September 11 decline, while
yields on longer-term Treasury securities had risen
enough to top their pre-attack levels. In early 2002,
however, yields on intermediate- and longer-term
Treasuries edged down again, as market participants
trimmed their expectations for the strength of the
economic rebound, and the Congress failed to move
forward with additional fiscal stimulus.

Yields on higher quality investment-grade corporate
bonds generally followed those on comparably dated
Treasury securities last year, although risk spreads
widened moderately before narrowing over the last few
months. In contrast, interest rates on speculative-grade
corporate debt increased steadily in 2001, as risk
spreads ballooned in response to mounting signs of
financial distress among weaker firms. Even with a
considerable narrowing over the final two months of the
year, risk spreads on below-investment-grade bonds
remained quite wide. Spreads for high-yield bonds
edged down further in 2002 after rising sharply in early
January, when several important technology and
telecommunications companies revised down their
earnings forecasts or released corrections to past
earnings statements. Interest rates on commercial and
industrial (C&I) loans at banks fell last year by about as
much as the federal funds rate. According to the
Federal Reserve's quarterly Survey of Terms of
Business Lending, the spread over the target federal
funds rate of the average interest rate on C&I loans
varied somewhat over the year, falling for a while then
rising sharply between August and November;
nonetheless, it has generally remained in the elevated
range that has persisted since late 1998. The same
survey also indicated that over the course of last year
commercial banks, like other lenders, have become
especially cautious about lending to marginal credits, as
indicated by the average spread on riskier C&I loans
not made under a previous commitment, which soared
in 2001.


Equity Markets

The exceptional volatility of equity prices in 2001 likely
reflected the dramatic fluctuations in investors'
assessment of the outlook for the economy and
corporate earnings. Share prices tumbled early last
year, as pessimism and uncertainty about the direction
of the economy were intensified by a spate of negative
earnings announcements and profit warnings in
February and March. The pronounced sell-off of
equities came to a halt at the end of the first quarter,
with the Wilshire 5000--a very broad index of stock
prices--down about 13 percent, while the tech-heavy
Nasdaq ended the first quarter at its lowest level since
1998 and more than 60 percent below its record high
reached in March of 2000.

Companies, especially in the technology sector,
reported weak profits for the first quarter, but their
announcements generally surpassed analysts' sharply
lowered expectations. With the 1 percentage point
reduction in the federal funds rate over March and
April, investors became more confident that an
improvement in economic conditions was in train, and
equity prices rallied; the rebound was particularly
strong for technology companies--the Nasdaq rose
almost 40 percent between April and the end of May.
The forward momentum in equity markets was checked
in June, however, in part because analysts slashed their
estimates for near-term corporate earnings growth.
Although the stock market initially proved resilient in
the face of the bleak profit news, suggesting that weak
earnings had been largely anticipated by investors, the
steady barrage of dismal economic news--particularly
in the technology and telecommunications
sectors--started to exert downward pressure on share
prices by early August. The slide in stock prices
intensified in early September, with technology stocks
taking an exceptional drubbing. By September 10, the
Wilshire 5000 was down almost 10 percent from the
end of July, while the Nasdaq had lost more than 16
percent.

The attacks on September 11, a Tuesday, caused
stock markets to shut down and to remain closed for
the rest of that week. Trading resumed in an orderly
fashion on Monday, September 17, but the day ended
with the market as a whole down about 5
percent--with airline and hotel stocks pounded
most--and trading volume on the New York Stock
Exchange hitting a record high. Major stock price
indexes, which sagged further in subsequent days and
weeks, were weighed down by investors' more
pessimistic evaluation of the near-term economic
outlook and by sizable downward revisions to analysts'
earnings projections for the rest of 2001. By the third
week of the month, broad stock price indexes had
fallen a total of 12 percent from their levels on
September 10.

In late September, stock prices staged a comeback
that lasted through the fourth quarter, as incoming
information suggested that the economy had proven
remarkably resilient and economic prospects were
improving. On the perception that the worst for the
technology sector would soon pass, share prices of
firms in technology industries jumped sharply, lifting the
Nasdaq more than 35 percent from its September
nadir. On balance, last year's gyrations in stock prices
left the Wilshire 5000 down about 10 percent, while
the Nasdaq fell 20 percent. The widespread decline in
equity prices through the first three quarters of 2001 is
estimated to have wiped out nearly $3-1/2 trillion in
household wealth, translating into 8-1/4 percent of total
household net worth. Of this total, however, about
$1-1/4 trillion was restored by the stock market rally in
the fourth quarter. Moreover, the level of household net
worth at the end of last year was still almost 50 percent
higher than it was at the end of 1995, when stepped-up
productivity gains had begun to induce investors to
boost significantly their expectations of long-term
earnings growth. In January and early February of
2002, investors reacted to generally disappointing news
about expected earnings, especially in the
telecommunications sector, and to concerns about
corporate accounting practices by erasing some of the
fourth-quarter gain in equity prices. Despite this decline,
the price-earnings ratio for the S&P 500 index
(calculated using operating earnings expected over the
next year) remained close to its level at the beginning of
2001. The relatively elevated ratio reflected lower
market interest rates as well as investor anticipation of a
return to robust earnings growth.


Debt and Depository Intermediation

The growth of the debt of nonfederal sectors was
strong over the first half of the year, as the decline in
longer-term interest rates during the final months of
2000 prompted some opportunistic tapping of bond
markets by businesses and helped keep the expansion
of household credit brisk. However, the combination of
a stepdown in the growth of consumer durables
purchases, a further drop in capital expenditures, and a
substantial inventory liquidation over the second half of
the year resulted in a significantly slower pace of private
borrowing. On balance, growth of nonfederal debt
retreated about 1 percentage point in 2001, to 7-1/2
percent. Federal debt continued to contract early last
year; it then turned up as the budget fell into a deficit
reflecting the implementation of the tax cut, the effect of
the weaker economy on tax receipts, and emergency
spending in the wake of the terrorist attacks. As a
result, the federal government paid down only 1-1/4
percent of its debt, on net, over 2001, compared with
6-3/4 percent in the previous year. With nominal GDP
decelerating sharply, the ratio of nonfinancial debt to
GDP moved up notably in 2001, more than reversing
its decrease in the previous year.

The economic slowdown and the decline in market
interest rates last year left a noticeable imprint on the
composition of financial flows, with borrowing by
businesses and households migrating toward
longer-term bond and mortgage markets. As a
consequence, credit at depository institutions expanded
sluggishly over the year. Growth of loans at commercial
banks dropped off sharply, from 12 percent in 2000 to
2-1/4 percent in 2001. The slowdown in total bank
credit--after adjustments for mark-to-market
accounting rules--was less severe, because banks
acquired securities, largely mortgage-backed securities,
at a brisk pace throughout the year. A healthy banking
sector served as an important safety valve for several
weeks after September 11, as businesses tapped
backup lines of credit to overcome problems
associated with the repayment of maturing commercial
paper and issuance of new paper. Moreover, with
payment flows temporarily interrupted by the terrorist
attacks, a substantial volume of overdrafts was created,
causing a spike in the "other" loan category that
includes loans to depository institutions. By the end of
October, however, the disruptions to business financing
patterns and payment systems that bloated bank
balance sheets had largely dissipated, and loans
contracted sharply.

Commercial banks reported a marked deterioration in
loan performance last year. Delinquency and charge-off
rates on C&I loans trended up appreciably, although
they remained well below rates recorded during the
1990-91 recession. Delinquency rates on credit card
accounts increased for the second year in a row,
reaching 5 percent for the first time since early 1992.
Banks responded to the deteriorating business and
household balance sheets by tightening credit standards
and terms for both types of loan, according to the
Federal Reserve's Senior Loan Officer Opinion Survey
on Bank Lending Practices. Banks indicated that they
had tightened business lending policies in response to
greater uncertainty about the economic outlook and
their reduced tolerance for risk. Similarly, the net
fractions of banks reporting that they had tightened
standards for both credit card and other consumer
loans rose markedly over the first half of last year. As
household financial conditions continued to slip, the net
proportion of banks that tightened standards on
consumer loans remained at an elevated level in the
second half of the year.

In response to rising levels of delinquent and
charged-off loans, commercial banks significantly
boosted the rate of provisioning for loan losses last
year, which, along with reduced income from capital
market activities, cut into the banking sector's profits.
Nonetheless, through the third quarter of 2001--the
latest period for which Call Report data are
available--measures of industry profitability remained
near the elevated range recorded for the past several
years, and banks continued to hold substantial capital
to absorb losses. Indeed, virtually all assets were at
well-capitalized banks at the end of the third quarter,
and the substitution of securities for loans on banks'
balance sheets also helped edge up risk-based capital
ratios. In the fourth quarter, a number of large banks
saw their profits decline further because of
their exposure to Enron and, to a lesser extent,
Argentina. On the positive side, wider net interest
margins helped support profits throughout 2001.


The Monetary Aggregates

The broad monetary aggregates grew very rapidly in
2001. Over the four quarters of the year, M2 increased
10-1/4 percent, a rate significantly above the pace of
the past several years. Because the rates of return
provided by many components of M2 move sluggishly,
the swift decline in short-term market interest rates last
year significantly lowered the opportunity cost of
holding M2 assets, especially for its liquid deposits (the
sum of checking and savings accounts) and retail
money funds components. Moreover, negative returns
and elevated volatility in equity markets likely raised
household demand for M2 assets through the fall. An
unprecedented level of mortgage refinancing activity
(which results in prepayments that temporarily
accumulate in deposit accounts before being distributed
to investors in mortgage-backed securities), as well as
increased foreign demand for U.S. currency, also
bolstered the growth of M2 over the course of the year.

Involuntary accumulation of liquid deposits resulting
from payment system disruptions after the terrorist
attacks, combined with elevated safe-haven demands,
caused M2 to surge temporarily in the weeks following
September 11. At the same time, plunging equity prices
led to a sharp step-up in the growth of retail money
market mutual funds. After a substantial unwinding of
distortions to money flows in October, M2 growth over
the balance of the year was spurred by further declines
in its opportunity cost resulting from additional
monetary policy easings and by heightened volatility in
equity markets. The hefty advance in M2 last year
outpaced the anemic expansion of nominal income, and
M2 velocity--the ratio of nominal GDP to M2--posted
a record decline.

M3--the broadest monetary aggregate--grew 13
percent over 2001. In addition to the surge in its M2
component, huge inflows into institutional money funds
boosted M3 growth. Investors' appetite for these
instruments was enormous last year because their
returns were unusually attractive as they lagged the
steep decline in market interest rates. The slow-down
in the growth of bank credit over the summer, which
resulted in a contraction in managed liabilities, damped
the rise in M3 somewhat. The velocity of M3 dropped
for the seventh year in the row, to a record low.


International Developments

Economic activity in foreign economies weakened
substantially in 2001. Early in the year, activity abroad
was depressed by high oil prices, the global slump in
the high-tech sector, and spillover from the U.S.
economic slowdown. The September terrorist attacks
further heightened economic uncertainty. On average,
foreign economic activity was about flat over the year.
The weakest performer among industrial economies
was Japan, where output declined. The euro area eked
out a slight increase in its real GDP. Activity in most
emerging market economies in both Asia and Latin
America declined. Asian developing economies were
particularly hard hit by the falloff in demand for their
high-tech exports. In Latin America, the output decline
in Mexico largely reflected sharply reduced export
demand from the United States; Argentina's financial
crisis precipitated a further sharp drop in output in that
country. An easing of average foreign inflation reflected
the weakness of activity as well as a net decline in
global oil prices over the course of the year.

In response to the pronounced weakness in economic
activity, monetary authorities in the major industrial
countries eased policy throughout the year.
Nevertheless, interest rates on long-term government
securities showed little net change from the beginning to
the end of the year in most major industrial countries.
Weak economic conditions tended to put downward
pressure on long-term rates, but moves toward more
stimulative macroeconomic policies appeared to
encourage market participants to expect economic
recovery, thereby supporting long-term interest rates.
Following the terrorist attacks in September, interest
rates declined around the globe as expected economic
activity weakened and demand shifted away from
equities and toward the relative safety of bonds.
However, toward year-end, as the period of crisis
passed, long-term interest rates rebounded strongly.

Overall stock indexes in foreign industrial economies
declined for the second consecutive year as activity
faltered and actual and projected corporate earnings
fell sharply. Technology-oriented stock indexes again
fell more than the overall indexes. Among emerging
market economies, the performance of stocks was
mixed; stock indexes in several Asian emerging market
economies rebounded strongly late in the year, a move
possibly reflecting market participants' hopes for a
revival in global demand for the high technology
products that feature prominently in these countries'
exports. Argentine financial markets came under
increasing pressure throughout the year because of
growing fears of a debt default and the end of the
peso's peg to the dollar. Near year-end, Argentine
authorities in fact suspended debt payments to the
private sector and, early in 2002, ended the one-to-one
peg to the dollar. There was limited negative spillover
to other emerging financial markets from the sharp
deterioration in Argentina's economic and financial
condition, in contrast to the situation that prevailed
during other emerging market financial crises of recent
years.

The dollar's average foreign exchange value remained
strong through most of 2001. The dollar continued to
rise despite mounting evidence of weakening U.S.
economic activity and the significant easing of monetary
policy by the FOMC. Market participants may have
felt that the falloff in economic growth in foreign
economies and expectations that the United States
offered stronger prospects for economic growth in the
future outweighed disappointing U.S. economic
performance in the near term. The dollar's average
foreign exchange value against the currencies of other
major industrial countries recorded a net increase of 8
percent over 2001 as a whole. The dollar also
strengthened, but by a lesser amount, against the
currencies of our most important developing country
trading partners. So far this year, the dollar's average
value has risen further on balance.


Industrial Economies

The dollar showed particular strength against the
Japanese yen last year, appreciating nearly 15 percent.
The weakness of the yen reflected serious ongoing
structural problems and the relapse of the Japanese
economy back into recession. Early in the year, in
response to signs of renewed weakening of the
economy, the Bank of Japan announced that it was
easing policy by shifting its operating target from the
overnight rate--already not far above zero--to balances
held by financial institutions at the Bank of Japan.
Policy was eased further and more liquidity was
injected into the banking system when the balances
target was raised three times later in the year.The yen
received a temporary boost when Junichiro Koizumi,
widely seen as more likely to introduce economic
reforms, became prime minister in April. The yen again
strengthened in the immediate wake of the September
terrorist attacks, prompting the Bank of Japan to make
substantial intervention sales of yen. However, later in
the year, amid signs of a renewed deterioration of
economic conditions, the yen again started to weaken
significantly.

For the year as a whole, Japanese real GDP is
estimated to have declined more than 1 percent, a
reversal of the rebound recorded the previous year.
Private investment declined and private consumption
moved lower, as households curtailed spending in the
face of rising unemployment and falling real income.
The winding-down of the large-scale public works
programs of recent years more than offset the effect on
growth from the additional spending contained in
several supplemental budgets. Last year marked the
third consecutive year of deflation, with the prices of
both consumer goods and real estate continuing to
move lower.

The dollar's movements against the euro in 2001
appear to have been mainly influenced by market
perceptions of the strength of economic activity in the
United States relative to that in the euro area. In the
early part of the year, the euro weakened as evidence
mounted that the economic slowdown that was already
apparent in the United States as the year began was
also taking hold in Europe. During the summer, the euro
rose against the dollar as market participants appeared
to revise downward their expectation of an early U.S.
recovery. Then, later in the year, with more signs of a
further weakening of activity in Europe, the euro again
declined. On balance, the dollar appreciated more than
5 percent relative to the euro over the course of the
year. Real GDP in the euro area is estimated to have
increased at less than a 1 percent rate in 2001, a sharp
slowing from the nearly 3 percent growth rate of the
previous year. Fixed investment and inventory
investment both are estimated to have made negative
contributions to the growth of real GDP, whereas
consumption growth remained near the rate of the
previous year. The slowing of growth in the euro area
was not uniform across countries, with weakness being
more pronounced in Germany and less so in France.

The European Central Bank (ECB) held off easing
monetary policy in the early months of the year,
restrained by the euro's weakness, growth of M3 that
remained in excess of the ECB's reference value, and a
euro-area inflation rate above its 2 percent target
ceiling. In May, evidence of slowing activity prompted
the ECB to reduce its key policy rate 25 basis points.
Three additional reductions followed later in the year,
as activity weakened further and the inflation rate
receded toward its target ceiling. The total reduction in
the ECB's key policy rate over the course of the year
was 150 basis points. The beginning of 2002 saw the
introduction of euro notes and coins, a process that
proceeded smoothly.

The dollar appreciated 6 percent against the Canadian
dollar in 2001 as the Canadian economy slowed
abruptly. Real GDP in Canada is estimated to have
been about flat last year after growing more than 3
percent in 2000. A key factor in this slowing was the
sharp drop-off in Canadian exports to the United
States. An inventory correction also depressed output.
Earlier in the year, consumption was buoyed by
continued employment growth, tax cuts, and a housing
boom. However, later in the year, growth of
consumption faltered as employment prospects
worsened and asset prices weakened. The Bank of
Canada has moved aggressively to counter the slowing
of economic activity by lowering its key policy interest
rate nine times in 2001 and once in January 2002 for a
cumulative total of 375 basis points.<footnote 3> When the Bank
of Canada initiated easing moves early in 2001, inflation
was slightly above the Bank's target range of 1 percent
to 3 percent; but by the end of the year, slack activity
and falling energy prices had pushed the inflation rate
down to near the bottom of the range.


Emerging Market Economies

Argentina was a main focus of attention among
emerging market economies in 2001. In the first part of
the year, worse-than-expected data on the fiscal
situation and concerns that the government would be
unable to implement announced fiscal measures
heightened doubts about whether Argentina would be
able to avoid a default on its debt. Argentine financial
markets received only temporary support from a
large-scale debt exchange completed in June and an
enhancement of IMF support approved in September.
With financial market confidence eroding, conditions
took a dramatic turn for the worse late in the year;
financial asset prices fell sharply, and funds moved out
of the banking system as the government moved to
restructure its debt and the one-to-one peg to the dollar
looked increasingly precarious. In early December, the
government imposed capital controls, including limits on
bank account withdrawals. These restrictions led to
widespread protests, which triggered the resignation of
President de la Rua and an interval of political turmoil.
After the resignation of President de la Rua, the
government announced it would suspend debt
payments to the private sector. The government of the
new president, Eduardo Duhalde, suspended
Argentina's currency board arrangement and
established a temporary dual exchange rate system. In
early February, the dual exchange rate system was
abandoned, and the peso's floating rate moved to about
2 pesos per dollar amid continuing economic
uncertainty. For 2001 as a whole, Argentine real GDP
is estimated to have fallen at well over a 5 percent rate,
and prices declined further.

To date, the negative spillover from events in Argentina
to other emerging financial markets has been limited,
possibly because market participants had been well
aware of Argentina's problems for some time and
viewed them as largely confined to that country. Brazil
was probably most heavily affected by events in
Argentina, and the bond spread on Brazilian debt
showed a net increase of about 110 basis points over
the course of last year while the spread on Argentina
debt exploded upward. Other important factors
weighing on Brazilian economic activity last year likely
were weak growth in the United States--Brazil's most
important export market--and the emergence of an
energy shortage as drought limited hydroelectric output.
For the year as a whole, Brazilian real GDP is
estimated to have risen at less than a 1 percent rate
after growing at a 4 percent rate the previous two
years. The Brazilian currency registered a net
depreciation against the dollar of about 16 percent over
the course of last year, while stock prices declined
more than 10 percent. The Brazilian central bank
tightened policy last year in an effort to hold down the
inflationary impact of currency depreciation.

Real GDP in Mexico declined about 1 percent in 2001,
a sharp reversal from the 5 percent growth rates
recorded in the previous two years. The falloff in
activity was mainly a reflection of the negative effects
on direct trade and confidence in Mexico arising from
the slowdown of the U.S. economy. In light of the
marked weakening of activity, declining inflation, and a
strong peso, the Bank of Mexico started to loosen the
stance of monetary policy in May, and short-term
interest rates continued to decline over the rest of the
year. In February 2002, the Bank of Mexico moved to
tighten monetary conditions, citing concerns that an
increase in administered prices would raise inflation.
Mexican financial markets fared quite well last year,
with the peso appreciating 5 percent against the dollar
and stock prices rising nearly 15 percent. The effect on
Mexican financial markets from Argentina's difficulties
appeared to have been quite limited, as indicated by the
net decline of the Mexican debt spread by 80 basis
points over the course of the year.

Economic growth in the Asian emerging market
economies turned negative last year. On average, real
GDP in developing Asia is estimated to have declined
about 1 percent in 2001, compared with average
growth of 6 percent in the previous year. A key factor
in this slowing was the sharp falloff in global demand for
the high-tech products that had fueled rapid export
growth in the region in recent years.

The economies of Taiwan, Singapore, and Malaysia
are highly dependent on exports of semiconductors and
other high-tech products, and as global demand for
these goods was cut back sharply, real GDP in these
countries declined by an estimated 5 percent on
average last year. Indonesia and Thailand, both
relatively less dependent on high-tech exports and
experiencing some reduction in political tension over the
course of the year, managed to record small positive
real GDP growth rates last year, albeit well below rates
of the previous year.

Korean real GDP is estimated to have increased about
2 percent in 2001. While in an absolute sense Korea is
an important exporter of high-tech products such as
semiconductors, it has a relatively more diversified
economy than most of its Asian neighbors, and thus the
magnitude of its slowdown last year was somewhat
muted. Government moves toward monetary and fiscal
policy stimulus over the course of the year helped
support domestic demand in Korea.

In China, recorded growth of real GDP remained
robust last year. China's lesser dependency on exports
in general, and high-tech exports in particular,
cushioned it from last year's global slowdown, and the
government stepped up the pace of fiscal stimulus to
offset weakening private demand. Hong Kong, with
exports not heavily concentrated in high-tech goods
and an economy closely integrated with a rapidly
growing Chinese economy, is nevertheless estimated to
have experienced a decline in real GDP last year. The
peg of Hong Kong's currency to a strengthening U.S.
dollar put pressure on its competitive position, and
domestic price deflation continued.

Conditions in financial markets in emerging Asia were,
for the most part, not particularly volatile last year.
Debt spreads were little changed on average for the
region as a whole, exchange rates against the dollar
generally moved lower, and stock indexes declined
somewhat on average.        
